Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.142

Current placement episode—Calculation.

If the most recent date that a child was removed from the home of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian for purposes of placement in out-of-home care occurred prior to the filing of a dependency petition or after filing but prior to entry of a disposition order, such time periods shall be included when calculating the length of the child's current placement episode.

[ 2000 c 122 s 14.]